District of Columbia statutes.
5-1407

Subpoena power for access to confidential medical records.

The CME is authorized to issue a subpoena for confidential medical records and relevant information from physicians, hospitals, nursing homes, residential care facilities and other health care providers as in his or her opinion is necessary for investigating deaths under this chapter. Any such subpoena issued by the CME may be enforced by order of the Superior Court. The Mayor shall, by regulation, prescribe procedures for issuing administrative subpoenas pursuant to this section.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2908, 47 DCR 6308

History

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2908 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).

Emergency Legislation

Delegation of Authority Pursuant to Title XXIX of D.C. Law 13-172, the “Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Act of 2000” Creating the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, see Mayor’s Order 2001-04, January 5, 2001 ( 48 DCR 938).

Delegation of Authority